California, session 20252026, AB290.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10095.8 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10095.8. (a) On or before April 1, 2026, the association shall create an automatic payment system and accept automatic payments for premiums from policyholders.(b) A policy shall not be canceled or nonrenewed solely because the policyholder is not enrolled in automatic payments.(c) If a policyholder fails to timely pay any outstanding installment premium, the policyholder shall have a period to pay the outstanding installment premium, in accordance with Section 677.4.